Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Reference Tables

Because of the extensive repeal of existing sections and the simultaneous enactment of new sections in AS 29, effective January 1, 1986, set out below are one table listing the sections that were effective until January 1, 1986 and the related sections effective as of that date and another table listing the sections effective as of January 1, 1986 and the related sections that were effective until that date.

Prior Law to 1985 Revision Prior law 1985 Revision 29.08.010 29.04.010 29.08.020 29.04.020 29.08.030 29.04.030 29.08.040 29.04.040 29.08.045(a) 29.04.050 29.08.045(a) 29.04.060 29.08.045(b) 29.04.050 29.08.045(c) 29.04.060 29.13.010 29.10.010 29.13.010 29.10.040(a) 29.13.020 29.10.040(b) 29.13.030 29.10.050 29.13.040 29.10.060 29.13.050 29.10.030 29.13.060 29.10.070 29.13.070 29.10.080(a) 29.13.070(b) 29.10.090(a) 29.13.080 29.10.100 29.13.100 29.10.200 29.13.100(9) 29.26.360 29.18.011 29.05.011 29.18.020 29.05.021 29.18.030 29.05.031(a) 29.18.050 29.05.060 29.18.060 29.05.070 29.18.070 29.05.080(a)-(b) 29.18.080(a) 29.05.080(c) 29.18.080(b) 29.05.090 29.18.090 29.05.100 29.18.110 29.05.110 29.18.120 29.05.120 29.18.130 29.05.130 29.18.140 29.05.140 29.18.150 29.05.150 29.18.180 29.05.180 29.18.180 29.05.190 29.18.201 29.65.010 29.18.202 29.65.020 29.18.203 29.65.030 29.18.204 29.65.040 29.18.205 29.65.050 29.18.206 29.65.060 29.18.207 29.65.070 29.18.208 29.65.080 29.18.209 29.65.090 29.18.210 29.65.100 29.18.211 29.65.110 29.18.212 29.65.120 29.18.213 29.65.130 29.23.010 29.20.050 29.23.021 29.20.060 29.23.023 29.20.070 29.23.025 29.20.080 29.23.027 29.20.090 29.23.029 29.20.100 29.23.031 29.20.110 29.23.033 29.20.120 29.23.040 29.20.150 29.23.050 29.20.140(a)-(c), (e) 29.23.060(a) 29.20.160(b) 29.23.060(b) 29.20.160(a) 29.23.060(c) 29.20.160(e)-(f) 29.23.060(c) 29.20.170 29.23.060(d) 29.20.160(c)-(d) 29.23.070 29.20.400 29.23.080 29.20.170 29.23.080 29.20.180(a), (c) 29.23.130(a) 29.20.250(a) 29.23.130(b) 29.20.240 29.23.130(c) 29.20.230(a) 29.23.130(e) 29.20.510 29.23.130(f) 29.20.280(a) 29.23.140 29.20.500 29.23.150 29.20.260 29.23.160 29.20.250(b) 29.23.170 29.20.270 29.23.180 29.20.280(b) 29.23.200 29.20.140(a)-(c), (e) 29.23.200 29.20.150 29.23.200(a), (c) 29.20.130 29.23.200(a) 29.20.220(a) 29.23.210(a) 29.20.160(b) 29.23.210(b) 29.20.160(e)-(f) 29.23.210(b) 29.20.170 29.23.210(c) 29.20.160(c)-(d) 29.23.220 29.20.170 29.23.220 29.20.180(a), (c) 29.23.240 29.20.160(a) 29.23.240 29.20.220(a)-(b) 29.23.250(a) 29.20.240 29.23.250(b) 29.20.230(a) 29.23.250(c) 29.20.230(b) 29.23.250(c) 29.20.240 29.23.250(d) 29.20.230(a)-(b) 29.23.255 29.20.280(a) 29.23.260 29.20.250(b) 29.23.270 29.20.270 29.23.280(a) 29.20.280(b) 29.23.280(b) 29.20.280(c) 29.23.290 29.20.250(a) 29.23.290 29.20.500 29.23.310 29.20.300 29.23.340 29.20.310 29.23.360 29.20.360 29.23.370 29.20.370 29.23.380 29.20.380 29.23.390 29.20.390 29.23.399 — 29.23.401 rep. 29.23.410 — 29.23.420 29.20.460 29.23.430 29.20.470 29.23.440 29.20.480 29.23.450 — 29.23.460 29.20.490 29.23.470 rep. 29.23.480 29.20.520 29.23.500 29.20.600 29.23.510 29.35.010(2) 29.23.520 29.20.610 29.23.530 29.20.620 29.23.540 29.20.630 29.23.550 29.20.410 29.23.555 29.20.010 29.23.560 29.20.640 29.23.570 29.20.170 29.23.570 29.20.280(a) 29.23.580 29.20.020 29.28.010 29.26.010 29.28.015 29.26.020 29.28.020(a) 29.26.040 29.28.020(b) 29.26.030 29.28.030 29.26.050 29.28.040 29.26.060 29.28.050 29.26.070 29.28.060 29.26.100 29.28.065 29.26.120 29.28.070 29.26.130 29.28.073 29.26.140 29.28.075 29.26.150 29.28.077 29.26.160 29.28.080 29.26.170 29.28.090 29.26.180 29.28.110 29.26.190 29.28.130 29.26.240 29.28.140 29.26.250 29.28.150 29.26.270 29.28.150 — 29.28.160 29.26.280 29.28.160 — 29.28.170 29.26.290 29.28.180 29.26.300 29.28.190 29.26.310 29.28.200 29.26.320 29.28.210 29.26.330 29.28.220 rep. 29.28.230 — 29.28.240 29.26.340 29.28.250 29.26.350 29.33.010(a) 29.35.150 29.33.010(b) 29.35.250 29.33.030 29.35.170 29.33.050 29.35.160 29.33.070 29.40.010 29.33.080(a)-(b) 29.40.020 29.33.085 29.40.030 29.33.090(a) 29.40.040(a) 29.33.110(a)-(b) 29.40.050 29.33.110(c) 29.40.040(b) 29.33.120 rep. 29.33.130(a)-(b) 29.40.060(a) 29.33.130(c) rep. 29.33.130(d)-(e) 29.40.060(b) 29.33.150(a) 29.40.070 — 29.40.080 29.33.150(b)-(g) 29.40.200 29.33.160(a)-(b) 29.40.110 29.33.160(c) rep. 29.33.170 29.40.090(b) 29.33.180 29.40.100 29.33.190 29.40.180 29.33.190 29.40.190 29.33.200 29.40.120 29.33.210 29.40.130 29.33.220 29.40.140 29.33.230 29.40.150 29.33.240 29.40.160 29.33.245 29.40.170 29.33.250 29.35.200(c) 29.33.250 29.35.210(d) 29.33.250 29.35.300 29.33.260 29.35.310 29.33.270 — 29.33.290 29.35.320 29.33.290(b) 29.35.330 29.33.290(c) 29.35.330 29.33.290(c) 29.35.340 29.38.010 29.35.200(a) 29.38.020 29.35.210(a) 29.38.030 — 29.38.050 29.35.210(c) 29.38.030 — 29.38.050 29.35.320 29.38.050(b)-(c) 29.35.330 29.41.010 29.35.220 29.41.010 29.35.300 29.41.010(b) 29.35.320 29.41.010(b) 29.35.490(a)-(b) 29.43.010 29.35.260(a) 29.43.020 29.45.550 29.43.030 29.35.260(b) 29.43.040 29.35.260(c) 29.43.040(b) 29.35.250 29.43.100 — 29.43.110 rep. 29.48.010 29.35.010(3)-(14) 29.48.010(1) 29.20.320 29.48.010(2) 29.35.010(1) 29.48.010(1) 29.35.210(a)(2) 29.48.010(2) 29.35.210(a)(3) 29.48.020(5) 29.35.210(a)(4) 29.48.020(6) 29.35.210(a)(6) 29.48.020(7) 29.35.210(a)(7) 29.48.020(8) 29.35.210(a)(9) 29.48.020(9) 29.35.210(a)(10) 29.48.030 29.35.200(b) 29.48.030(a)(12) 29.35.210(a)(1), (b)(1) 29.48.033 29.35.050 29.48.035(a)(5), (b) 29.35.210(a)(3), (b)(2) 29.48.035(a)(10) 29.35.080 29.48.035(a)(17), (b) 29.35.210(a)(6) 29.48.035(a)(17), (b) 29.35.210(b)(4) 29.48.035(a)(18), (b) 29.35.210(a)(5) 29.48.035(a)(18), (b) 29.35.210(b)(3) 29.48.035(a)(20), (b) 29.35.210(b)(5) 29.48.035(b) 29.35.200(b) 29.48.035(b) 29.35.250 29.48.036 29.35.140 29.48.037 29.35.020 29.48.040 29.35.020 29.48.050(a)-(b) 29.35.060 29.48.050(c) rep. 29.48.060 29.35.070 29.48.070 — 29.48.100 rep. 29.48.108 29.55.010 29.48.110 29.55.020 29.48.130 29.25.010 29.48.140 — 29.48.150 29.25.020 29.48.160 29.25.030 29.48.170 29.25.040 29.48.180 29.25.050 29.48.185 29.25.060 29.48.190 29.35.100 29.48.200 29.25.070 29.48.210 29.35.110 29.48.220 29.35.120 29.48.250 rep. 29.48.260 29.35.090 29.48.270 29.35.040 29.48.310 29.35.400 29.48.320 29.35.410 29.48.330 29.35.420 29.53.010 29.45.010 29.53.020 29.45.030 29.53.025 29.45.050 29.53.030 rep. 29.53.035 29.45.060 29.53.040 29.45.070 29.53.045 29.45.080 29.53.050 29.45.090 29.53.055 29.45.100 29.53.060 29.45.110 29.53.070 29.45.120 29.53.080 29.45.130 29.53.090 29.45.140 29.53.095 29.45.150 29.53.100 29.45.160 29.53.103 29.45.103 29.53.105 29.45.105 29.53.110 29.45.170 29.53.120 29.45.180 29.53.130 29.45.190 29.53.135 29.45.200(a)-(b) 29.53.140 29.45.210 29.53.150 29.45.220 29.53.160 29.45.230 29.53.170 29.45.240 29.53.180 29.45.250 29.53.200 29.45.290 29.53.210 29.45.300 29.53.220 29.45.310 29.53.230 29.45.320 29.53.240 29.45.330 29.53.250 29.45.340 29.53.260 29.45.350 29.53.270 29.45.360 29.53.280 29.45.370 29.53.290 29.45.380 29.53.300 29.45.390 29.53.310 29.45.400 29.53.320 29.45.410 29.53.330 29.45.420 29.53.340 29.45.430 29.53.350 29.45.440 29.53.360 29.45.450 29.53.370 29.45.460 29.53.375 29.45.470 29.53.380 29.45.480 29.53.385 29.45.490 29.53.390 29.45.500 29.53.400 29.45.560 29.53.405 29.45.580 29.53.410 29.45.590 29.53.415 29.45.650 29.53.420(a) 29.45.670 29.53.440 — 29.53.450 29.45.700 29.53.460 29.45.710 29.58.010 29.47.010 29.58.020 29.47.020 29.58.040 29.47.030 29.58.050 29.47.040 29.58.060 29.47.400 29.58.070 29.47.080 29.58.080 29.47.090 29.58.090 29.47.100 29.58.100 29.47.110 29.58.110 29.47.120 29.58.120 29.47.130 29.58.130 29.47.140 29.58.140 29.47.400 29.58.150 29.47.180 29.58.160 29.47.190 29.58.170 29.47.410 29.58.180 29.47.200 29.58.200 29.47.240 29.58.200(c) 29.47.390 29.58.205 29.47.250 29.58.210 29.47.410 29.58.220 rep. 29.58.240 29.47.300 29.58.250 29.47.310 29.58.260 29.47.320 29.58.270 29.47.330 29.58.280 29.47.340 29.58.300 29.47.400 29.58.310 29.47.420 29.58.315 rep. 29.58.320 29.47.430 29.58.340 29.47.440 29.58.345 rep. 29.58.350 rep. 29.63.010 29.46.010 29.63.015 29.46.020 29.63.020 29.46.030 29.63.025 29.46.040 29.63.030 29.46.050 29.63.040 29.46.060 29.63.040(a) 29.46.110(b) 29.63.050 29.46.070 29.63.060 29.46.080 29.63.065 29.46.090 29.63.070 29.46.100 29.63.080 29.46.120 29.63.085 29.46.140 29.63.090(a) 29.35.450 29.63.090(a) 29.35.480 29.63.090(a) 29.35.490(a) 29.63.090(b) 29.35.470 29.63.090(c) 29.35.460 29.63.090(d) 29.35.450 29.63.090(e) 29.35.470 — 29.35.480 29.63.090(e) 29.35.490(a) 29.63.090(f) 29.35.490(c) 29.68.010 29.06.040 29.68.020 29.06.050 29.68.030 29.06.090 29.68.040 29.06.100 29.68.050 — 29.68.070 29.06.110 29.68.070(b) 29.06.120 29.68.080 29.06.130 29.68.090 29.06.140 29.68.100 29.06.150 29.68.110 29.06.160 29.68.240 29.06.190 29.68.250 29.06.200 29.68.260 29.06.210 29.68.270 29.06.220 29.68.280 — 29.68.290 29.06.250(a)-(c) 29.68.300 29.06.260 29.68.310 29.06.240 29.68.320 29.06.270 29.68.330 29.06.280 29.68.340(a)-(d) 29.06.290 29.68.340(e) 29.06.300 29.68.340(f) 29.06.310 29.68.350 29.06.320 29.68.350(a) 29.06.230 29.68.360 29.06.330 29.68.370 29.06.340 29.68.380 29.06.350 29.68.390(a) 29.06.360(a) 29.68.390(b)-(d) 29.06.360(b)-(d) 29.68.390(e) 29.06.300 29.68.400 29.06.370 29.68.410 29.06.380 29.68.420 29.06.390 29.68.430 29.06.400 29.68.440 29.06.410 29.68.500 29.06.450 29.68.510 29.06.460 29.68.520 29.06.470 29.68.530 — 29.68.540 29.06.480 29.68.550 29.06.490 29.68.560 29.06.500(a) 29.68.570 29.06.510 29.68.580 29.06.520 29.68.635(a) 29.06.360(a) 29.73.020 29.35.030 29.73.030 29.71.010 29.73.040 29.71.030 29.73.050 29.06.010 29.73.060 29.45.040 29.73.062 29.45.045 29.73.070(a) 29.45.020 29.73.070(b) 29.45.660 29.73.070(c) 29.45.020 29.73.070(c) 29.45.660 29.73.080 29.35.130 29.78.010 29.71.800 29.88.010 29.60.010 29.88.015 29.60.020 29.88.020 29.60.030 29.88.025 29.60.040 29.88.030 29.60.050 29.88.035 29.60.060 29.88.040 29.60.070 29.88.045 29.60.080 29.89.010 29.60.100 29.89.020 29.60.110 29.89.030 29.60.120 29.89.040 29.60.130 29.89.050 29.60.140 29.89.060 29.60.150 29.89.070 29.60.160 29.89.080 29.60.170 29.89.090 29.60.180 29.89.100(2)-(3 29.60.120 29.89.110 29.60.400 — 29.60.440 29.95.010 29.60.280 29.95.020 29.60.290 29.95.030 29.60.300 43.20.016 29.60.350 — 29.60.370 1985 Revision to Prior Law 1985 Revision Prior law 29.04.010 29.08.010 29.04.020 29.08.020 29.04.030 29.08.030 29.04.040 29.08.040 29.04.050 29.08.045(a)-(b) 29.04.060 29.08.045(a), (c) 29.05.011 29.18.011 29.05.021 29.18.020 29.05.031(a) 29.18.030 29.05.031(b) none 29.05.060 29.18.050 29.05.070 29.18.060 29.05.080(a)-(b) 29.18.070 29.05.080(c) 29.18.080(a) 29.05.090 29.18.080(b) 29.05.100 29.18.090 29.05.110 29.18.110 29.05.120 29.18.120 29.05.130 29.18.130 29.05.140 29.18.140 29.05.150 29.18.150 29.05.180 29.18.180 29.05.190 29.18.180 29.05.200 none 29.05.210 none 29.06.010 29.73.050 29.06.040 29.68.010 29.06.050 29.68.020 29.06.060 none 29.06.090 29.68.030 29.06.100 29.68.040 29.06.110 29.68.050 — 29.68.070 29.06.120 29.68.070(b) 29.06.130 29.68.080 29.06.140 29.68.090 29.06.150 29.68.100 29.06.160 29.68.110 29.06.170 none 29.06.190 29.68.240 29.06.200 29.68.250 29.06.210 29.68.260 29.06.220 29.68.270 29.06.230 29.68.350(a) 29.06.240 29.68.310 29.06.250(a)-(c) 29.68.280 — 29.68.290 29.06.250(d) 29.68.280 — 29.68.290 29.06.260 29.68.300 29.06.270 29.68.320 29.06.280 29.68.330 29.06.290 29.68.340(a)-(d) 29.06.300 29.68.340(e) 29.06.300 29.68.390(e) 29.06.310 29.68.340(f) 29.06.320 29.68.350 29.06.330 29.68.360 29.06.340 29.68.370 29.06.350 29.68.380 29.06.360(a) 29.68.390(a) 29.06.360(a) 29.68.635(a) 29.06.360(b)-(d) 29.68.390(b)-(d) 29.06.370 29.68.400 29.06.380 29.68.410 29.06.390 29.68.420 29.06.400 29.68.430 29.06.410 29.68.440 29.06.420 none 29.06.450 29.68.500 29.06.460 29.68.510 29.06.470 29.68.520 29.06.480 29.68.530 — 29.68.540 29.06.490 29.68.550 29.06.500(a) 29.68.560 29.06.500(b) none 29.06.510 29.68.570 29.06.520 29.68.580 29.06.530 none 29.10.010 29.13.010 29.10.020 none 29.10.030 29.13.050 29.10.040(a) 29.13.010 29.10.040(b) 29.13.020 29.10.040(c) none 29.10.050 29.13.030 29.10.060 29.13.040 29.10.070 29.13.060 29.10.080(a) 29.13.070 29.10.080(b) none 29.10.090(a) 29.13.070(b) 29.10.090(b) none 29.10.100 29.13.080 29.10.200 29.13.100 29.20.010 29.23.555 29.20.020 29.23.580 29.20.050 29.23.010 29.20.060 29.23.021 29.20.070 29.23.023 29.20.080 29.23.025 29.20.090 29.23.027 29.20.100 29.23.029 29.20.110 29.23.031 29.20.120 29.23.033 29.20.130 29.23.200(a) 29.20.140(a)-(c) 29.23.050 29.20.140(a)-(c) 29.23.200 29.20.140(d) none 29.20.140(e) 29.23.050 29.20.140(e) 29.23.200 29.20.150 29.23.040 29.20.150 29.23.200 29.20.160(a) 29.23.060(b) 29.20.160(a) 29.23.240 29.20.160(b) 29.23.060(a) 29.20.160(b) 29.23.210(a) 29.20.160(c)-(d) 29.23.060(d) 29.20.160(c)-(d) 29.23.210(c) 29.20.160(e)-(f) 29.23.060(c) 29.20.160(e)-(f) 29.23.210(b) 29.20.170 29.23.060(c) 29.20.170 29.23.080 29.20.170 29.23.210(b) 29.20.170 29.23.220 29.20.170 29.23.570 29.20.180(a) 29.23.080 29.20.180(a) 29.23.220 29.20.180(b) none 29.20.180(c) 29.23.080 29.20.180(c) 29.23.220 29.20.220(a) 29.23.200(a), (c) 29.20.220(a) 29.23.240 29.20.220(b) 29.23.240 29.20.220(c) none 29.20.230(a) 29.23.130(c) 29.20.230(a) 29.23.250(b), (d) 29.20.230(b) 29.23.250(c)-(d) 29.20.230(c) none 29.20.240 29.23.130(b) 29.20.240 29.23.250(a), (c) 29.20.250(a) 29.23.130(a) 29.20.250(a) 29.23.290 29.20.250(b) 29.23.160 29.20.250(b) 29.23.260 29.20.260 29.23.150 29.20.270 29.23.170 29.20.270 29.23.270 29.20.280(a) 29.23.130(f) 29.20.280(a) 29.23.255 29.20.280(a) 29.23.570 29.20.280(b) 29.23.180 29.20.280(b) 29.23.280(a) 29.20.280(c) 29.23.280(b) 29.20.300 29.23.310 29.20.310 29.23.340 29.20.320 29.48.010(1) 29.20.360 29.23.360 29.20.370 29.23.370 29.20.380 29.23.380 29.20.390 29.23.390 29.20.400 29.23.070 29.20.410 29.23.550 29.20.460 29.23.410 — 29.23.420 29.20.470 29.23.430 29.20.480 29.23.440 29.20.490 29.23.450 — 29.23.460 29.20.500 29.23.140 29.20.500 29.23.290 29.20.510 29.23.130(e) 29.20.520 29.23.480 29.20.600 29.23.500 29.20.610 29.23.520 29.20.620 29.23.530 29.20.630 29.23.540 29.20.640 29.23.560 29.25.010 29.48.130 29.25.020 29.48.140 — 29.48.150 29.25.030 29.48.160 29.25.040 29.48.170 29.25.050 29.48.180 29.25.060 29.48.185 29.25.070 29.48.200 29.26.010 29.28.010 29.26.020 29.28.015 29.26.030 29.28.020(b) 29.26.040 29.28.020(a) 29.26.050 29.28.030 29.26.060 29.28.040 29.26.070 29.28.050 29.26.100 29.28.060 29.26.110 none 29.26.120 29.28.065 29.26.130 29.28.070 29.26.140 29.28.073 29.26.150 29.28.075 29.26.160 29.28.077 29.26.170 29.28.080 29.26.180 29.28.090 29.26.190 29.28.110 29.26.240 29.28.130 29.26.250 29.28.140 29.26.260 none 29.26.270 29.28.150 29.26.280 29.28.150 — 29.28.160 29.26.290 29.28.160 — 29.28.170 29.26.300 29.28.180 29.26.310 29.28.190 29.26.320 29.28.200 29.26.330 29.28.210 29.26.340 29.28.230 — 29.28.240 29.26.350 29.28.250 29.26.360 29.13.100(9) 29.35.010(1) 29.48.010(2) 29.35.010(2) 29.23.510 29.35.010(3)(14) 29.48.010 29.35.020 29.48.037 29.35.020 29.48.040 29.35.030 29.73.020 29.35.040 29.48.270 29.35.050 29.48.033 29.35.060 29.48.050(a)-(b) 29.35.070 29.48.060 29.35.080 29.48.035(a)(10) 29.35.090 29.48.260 29.35.100 29.48.190 29.35.110 29.48.210 29.35.120 29.48.220 29.35.130 29.73.080 29.35.140 29.48.036 29.35.145 none 29.35.150 29.33.010(a) 29.35.160 29.33.050 29.35.170 29.33.030 29.35.180 none 29.35.200(a) 29.38.010 29.35.200(b) 29.48.030 29.35.200(b) 29.48.035(b) 29.35.200(c) 29.33.250 29.35.210(a) 29.38.020 29.35.210(a)(l) 29.48.030(a)(12) 29.35.210(a)(2) 29.48.020(1) 29.35.210(a)(3) 29.48.020(2) 29.35.210(a)(3) 29.48.035(a)(5), (b) 29.35.210(a)(4) 29.48.020(5) 29.35.210(a)(5) 29.48.035(a)(18), (b) 29.35.210(a)(6) 29.48.020(6) 29.35.210(a)(6) 29.48.035(a)(17), (b) 29.35.210(a)(7) 29.48.020(7) 29.35.210(a)(8) none 29.35.210(a)(9) 29.48.020(8) 29.35.210(a)(10) 29.48.020(9) 29.35.210(b)(1) 29.48.030(a)(12) 29.35.210(b)(2) 29.48.035(a)(5), (b) 29.35.210(b)(3) 29.48.035(a)(18), (b) 29.35.210(b)(4) 29.48.035(a)(17), (b) 29.35.210(b)(5) 29.48.305(a)(20), (b) 29.35.210(c) 29.38.030 — 29.38.050 29.35.210(d) 29.33.250 29.35.220 29.41.010 29.35.250 29.33.010(b) 29.35.250 29.43.040(b) 29.35.250 29.48.035(b) 29.35.260(a) 29.43.010 29.35.260(b) 29.43.030 29.35.260(c) 29.43.040 29.35.260(d) none 29.35.300 29.33.250 29.35.300 29.41.010 29.35.310 29.33.260 29.35.320 29.33.270 — 29.33.290 29.35.320 29.38.030 — 29.38.050 29.35.320 29.41.010(b) 29.35.330 29.33.290(b)-(c) 29.35.330 29.38.050(b)-(c) 29.35.340 29.33.290(c) 29.35.400 29.48.310 29.35.410 29.48.320 29.35.420 29.48.330 29.35.450 29.63.090(a), (d) 29.35.460 29.63.090(c) 29.35.470 29.63.090(b), (e) 29.35.480 29.63.090(a), (e) 29.35.490(a) 29.41.010(b) 29.35.490(a) 29.63.090(a), (e) 29.35.490(b) 29.41.010(b) 29.35.490(c) 29.63.090(f) 29.40.010 29.33.070 29.40.020 29.33.080(a)-(b) 29.40.030 29.33.085 29.40.040(a) 29.33.090(a) 29.40.040(b) 29.33.110(c) 29.40.050 29.33.110(a)-(b) 29.40.060(a) 29.33.130(a)-(b) 29.40.060(b) 29.33.130(d)-(e) 29.40.070 — 29.40.080 29.33.150(a) 29.40.090(a) none 29.40.090(b) 29.33.170 29.40.100 29.33.180 29.40.110 29.33.160(a)-(b) 29.40.120 29.33.200 29.40.130 29.33.210 29.40.140 29.33.220 29.40.150 29.33.230 29.40.160 29.33.240 29.40.170 29.33.245 29.40.180 29.33.190 29.40.190 29.33.190 29.40.200 29.33.150(b)-(g) 29.45.010 29.53.010 29.45.020 29.73.070(a), (c) 29.45.030 29.53.020 29.45.040 29.73.060 29.45.045 29.73.062 29.45.050 29.53.025 29.45.060 29.53.035 29.45.070 29.53.040 29.45.080 29.53.045 29.45.090 29.53.050 29.45.100 29.53.055 29.45.103 29.53.103 29.45.105 29.53.105 29.45.110 29.53.060 29.45.120 29.53.070 29.45.130 29.53.080 29.45.140 29.53.090 29.45.150 29.53.095 29.45.160 29.53.100 29.45.170 29.53.110 29.45.180 29.53.120 29.45.190 29.53.130 29.45.200(a)-(b) 29.53.135 29.45.200(c) none 29.45.210 29.53.140 29.45.220 29.53.150 29.45.230 29.53.160 29.45.240 29.53.170 29.45.250 29.53.180 29.45.290 29.53.200 29.45.300 29.53.210 29.45.310 29.53.220 29.45.320 29.53.230 29.45.330 29.53.240 29.45.340 29.53.250 29.45.350 29.53.260 29.45.360 29.53.270 29.45.370 29.53.280 29.45.380 29.53.290 29.45.390 29.53.300 29.45.400 29.53.310 29.45.410 29.53.320 29.45.420 29.53.330 29.45.430 29.53.340 29.45.440 29.53.350 29.45.450 29.53.360 29.45.460 29.53.370 29.45.470 29.53.375 29.45.480 29.53.380 29.45.490 29.53.385 29.45.500 29.53.390 29.45.550 29.43.020 29.45.560 29.53.400 29.45.570 none 29.45.580 29.53.405 29.45.590 29.53.410 29.45.600 none 29.45.650 29.53.415 29.45.660 29.73.070(b)-(c) 29.45.670 29.53.420(a) 29.45.700 29.53.440 — 29.53.450 29.45.710 29.53.460 29.46.010 29.63.010 29.46.020 29.63.015 29.46.030 29.63.020 29.46.040 29.63.025 29.46.050 29.63.030 29.46.060 29.63.040 29.46.070 29.63.050 29.46.080 29.63.060 29.46.090 29.63.065 29.46.100 29.63.070 29.46.110(a) none 29.46.110(b) 29.63.040(a) 29.46.120 29.63.080 29.46.130 none 29.46.140 29.63.085 29.47.010 29.58.010 29.47.020 29.58.020 29.47.030 29.58.040 29.47.040 29.58.050 29.47.080 29.58.070 29.47.090 29.58.080 29.47.100 29.58.090 29.47.110 29.58.100 29.47.120 29.58.110 29.47.130 29.58.120 29.47.140 29.58.130 29.47.180 29.58.150 29.47.190 29.58.160 29.47.200 29.58.180 29.47.240 29.58.200 29.47.250 29.58.205 29.47.260 none 29.47.300 29.58.240 29.47.310 29.58.250 29.47.320 29.58.260 29.47.330 29.58.270 29.47.340 29.58.280 29.47.390 29.58.200(c) 29.47.400 29.58.060 29.47.400 29.58.140 29.47.400 29.58.300 29.47.410 29.58.170 29.47.410 29.58.210 29.47.420 29.58.310 29.47.430 29.58.320 29.47.440 29.58.340 29.47.450 none 29.55.010 29.48.108 29.55.020 29.48.110 29.60.010 29.88.010 29.60.020 29.88.015 29.60.030 29.88.020 29.60.040 29.88.025 29.60.050 29.88.030 29.60.060 29.88.035 29.60.070 29.88.040 29.60.080 29.88.045 29.60.100 29.89.010 29.60.110 29.89.020 29.60.120 29.89.030 29.60.120 29.89.100(2)-(3) 29.60.130 29.89.040 29.60.140 29.89.050 29.60.150 29.89.060 29.60.160 29.89.070 29.60.170 29.89.080 29.60.180 29.89.090 29.60.280 29.95.010 29.60.290 29.95.020 29.60.300 29.95.030 29.60.350 — 29.60.370 43.20.016 29.60.400 — 29.60.440 29.89.110 29.65.010 29.18.201 29.65.020 29.18.202 29.65.030 29.18.203 29.65.040 29.18.204 29.65.050 29.18.205 29.65.060 29.18.206 29.65.070 29.18.207 29.65.080 29.18.208 29.65.090 29.18.209 29.65.100 29.18.210 29.65.110 29.18.211 29.65.120 29.18.212 29.65.130 29.18.213 29.65.140 none 29.71.010 29.73.030 29.71.020 none 29.71.030 29.73.040 29.71.800 29.78.010

Click to view

Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1986 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982, and in 1986, 1992, 1996, 2008, and 2016 to make other, minor word changes.

Cross references. —

For a temporary provision extending deadlines under this title until November 15, 2020, or the end of the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared on March 11, 2020, whichever
first occurs, see § 13, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 1, ch. 74, SLA 1985 provides:
“PURPOSE.
The legislature finds that the municipal code contains many provisions that have created problems for municipalities that must function under AS 29 and that the title is poorly organized and difficult for people to use. Therefore, it is the purpose of the legislature to revise and reorganize the municipal code to permit local government to function more effectively. Except as expressly provided, the legislature does not intend by this Act to alter or affect in any way the relationship or balance of authority between the state and home rule or general law municipalities with respect to the timing or manner of resource development under AS 31, AS 38, or other provisions of law. Except as expressly provided, the legislature does not intend by this Act to increase or reduce the authority of state agencies to carry out their functions under other titles.”

Section 89, ch. 74, SLA 1985 provides:
“A right or liability of a municipality existing on January 1, 1986, is not affected by the enactment of this Act.
Ordinances and regulations in effect on January 1, 1986, remain in effect unless they conflict with provisions of this Act.
Ordinances and regulations in effect on January 1, 1986, that conflict with provisions of this Act remain in effect for 180 days after January 1986.
The terms of elected or appointed municipal officials in office on January 1986, are not affected by this Act, and their terms expire as provided before January 1, 1986.”

Collateral references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 1 et seq.

62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1 et seq.

Waiver of competitive bidding requirements for state and local public building and construction contracts. 40 ALR4th 968.